phonetize-num.xfst
!
! Convertion of numbers to their surface forms.
!

define intSym @"intermediate-symbols.a";
define R1       [Ⅰ|I|ⅰ|i];
define R5       [v|ⅴ|V|Ⅴ];
define R10      [X|Ⅹ|x|ⅹ];
define R50      [L|Ⅼ|l|ⅼ];
define R100     [C|Ⅽ|c|ⅽ];
define R500     [D|Ⅾ|d|ⅾ];
define R1000    [M|Ⅿ|m|ⅿ];
define rdigit   R1|R5|R10|R50|R100|R500|R1000;
define digit    [%0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9];
define nonzero  digit - %0;
define numArabic ⟪RB⟫ [⟨ara⟩|⟨time⟩|⟨date⟩];
define numRoman  ⟪RB⟫ ⟨rom⟩;

regex   [..] -> ⟪sBRV⟫ ⟪sVC⟫
                || nonzero %0^{12,14} / ⟪tSep⟫   _ numArabic, ! trilyon
                   nonzero %0^{6,8}   / ⟪tSep⟫   _ numArabic, ! milyon
                   [¹|1|3] %0                _ numArabic, ! 10,30
                   9                       _ numArabic,
                   R1   R10                _ numRoman,  ! 9
                   [\[R50|R10|R1]|.#.] R10^{1,3} _ numRoman,  ! 10,30
                   [Ⅸ|ⅸ]                   _ numRoman   ! 9
    ,,  [..] -> ⟪sBUV⟫ ⟪sVC⟫ 
                || nonzero %0^{9,11}  / ⟪tSep⟫   _ numArabic, ! milyar
                   [\[digit|⟪tSep⟫]|.#.] %0+     _ numArabic, ! 0, 00, a00
                   9 %0                    _ numArabic, ! doksan
                   R10 R100                _ numRoman ! 90
    ,,  [..] -> ⟪sFUV⟫ ⟪sVC⟫ 
                || nonzero %0^{3,5}   / ⟪tSep⟫   _ numArabic, ! bin
                   8 %0                    _ numArabic, ! seksen
                   1                       _ numArabic,
                   8                       _ numArabic,
                   [Ⅷ|ⅷ|Ⅺ]                 _ numRoman, ! 8
                   R5 R1^3                 _ numRoman, ! 8
                   [\[R5|R1]|.#.] R1       _ numRoman, ! 1
                   R50 R10^3               _ numRoman, ! 80
                   [\R100|.#.] R1000       _ numRoman  ! 1000
    ,,  [..] -> ⟪sFRV⟫ ⟪sVC⟫ 
                || nonzero %0^2            _ numArabic,     ! yüz
                   [\[R10|R1]|.#.] R100    _ numRoman, ! 100
                   R500                    _ numRoman, ! 500
                   R100 R1000              _ numRoman  ! 900
    ,,  [..] -> ⟪sBUV⟫ ⟪sUC⟫
                || 4 %0                    _ numArabic,
                   6 %0                    _ numArabic,
                   R10 R50                 _ numRoman, ! 40
                   R50 R10                 _ numRoman  ! 60
    ,,  [..] -> ⟪sFUV⟫ ⟪sUC⟫ 
                || 7 %0                    _ numArabic,
                   5                       _ numArabic,
                   [\[R1]|.#.] R5          _ numRoman, ! 5
                   R50 R10^2               _ numRoman  ! 70
    ,,  [..] -> ⟪sFRV⟫ ⟪sUC⟫
                || [³|3|4|¼|¾]             _ numArabic,
                   [Ⅲ|ⅲ|Ⅳ|ⅳ]               _ numRoman, ! 3,4
                   R1 R5                   _ numRoman, ! 4
                   [\R5|.#.] R1^{3,4}      _ numRoman  ! 3,4
    ,,  [..] -> ⟪sBUV⟫
                || 6                       _ numArabic,
                   R5 R1                   _ numRoman, ! 6
                   [Ⅵ|ⅵ]                   _ numRoman  ! 6
    ,,  [..] -> ⟪sFUV⟫
                || [2|5] %0                _ numArabic,
                   [²|2|½|7]               _ numArabic,
                   [\R10|.#.] R50          _ numRoman, ! 50
                   [\R50|.#.] R10^2        _ numRoman, ! 20
                   [\R1|.#.] R1^2          _ numRoman, ! 2,7
                   [Ⅱ|ⅱ|Ⅶ|ⅶ|Ⅻ|ⅻ]           _ numRoman  ! 2,7,12
! numbers
    ,, ⟨dist⟩ -> (⟪apos⟫) ⟪bş⟫ ⟪A⟫ r
    ,, ⟨ord⟩ -> %. || [digit|rdigit] ⟪RB⟫ [⟨ara⟩|⟨rom⟩] ⟪MB⟫ _ 
    ,, ⟨ord⟩  -> (⟪apos⟫) ⟪bI⟫ n c ⟪I⟫
    ,, [⟨ara⟩|⟨rom⟩|⟨date⟩|⟨time⟩] -> 0
! decimal / thousand separator replacement
    ,, ⟪tSep⟫ -> "."|","
    ,, ⟪dSep⟫ -> "."|","
    ,, ⟪DB⟫ (->) " " || _ intSym* \⟪RB⟫ !TODO: double check
    ,, ⟪DB⟫ -> 0
;
